Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-961
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Correctional System Overcrowding Emergency Act:

(1) Board means the Board of Parole;

(2) Committed offender has the definition found in section 83-170;

(3) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;

(4) Design capacity means the total designed bed space in facilities operated by the department, as certified by the director;

(5) Director means the Director of Correctional Services;

(6) Operational capacity means one hundred twenty-five percent of design capacity;

(7) Population means the actual number of inmates assigned to facilities operated by the department and does not include inmates assigned to county-operated correctional institutions; and

(8) Violent offense means any one or more of the following crimes: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, manslaughter, assault in the first degree, kidnapping, sexual assault in the first degree, or robbery.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 47.